Utah statutes.
71-8-7.   Government entity veterans' affairs specialist -- Duties -- Training.

(1)  Each government entity listed in Section 71-8-6 shall appoint or designate a full-time employee as a veterans' affairs specialist.

(2)  The veterans' affairs specialist shall:

(a)  coordinate the provision of veterans' services by the government entity with the department; and

(b)  attend annual training by the department on coordination processes including providing nonprotected or nonprivate information to the department.



Enacted by Chapter 308, 2013 General Session

